District of Columbia statutes.
34-1731.11

Severability.

If a provision of this chapter or its application to a particular person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity does not affect other persons or applications.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-210, § 12, 53 DCR 9122
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 12 of Digital Inclusion Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-467, July 25, 2006, 53 DCR 6754).